Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 3. Uniform Trustees’ Powers.

§§ 91-9-101 through 91-9-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 106, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§91-9-101. [Codes, 1942, § 672-130; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 10, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-103. [Codes, 1942, § 672-121; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 474, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2006.]

§91-9-105. [Codes, 1942, § 672-122; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-107. [Codes, 1942, § 672-123; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 589, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 374, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 616 , § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 474, § 20; Laws, 2008, ch. 452, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 8, 2008.)]

§91-9-109. [Codes, 1942, § 672-124; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 4, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-111. [Codes, 1942, § 672-125; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 5, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-113. [Codes, 1942, § 672-126; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 6, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-115. [Codes, 1942, § 672-127; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 7, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-117. [Codes, 1942, § 672-128; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 8, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]

§91-9-119. [Codes, 1942, § 672-129; Laws, 1966, ch. 372, § 9, eff from and after June 30, 1966.]